Idaho, session 2025, H0349.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Chapter 5, Title 33, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 33-512E, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
33-512E. INAPPROPRIATE ONLINE BEHAVIOR -- DISCIPLINARY MEASURES. (1)
Any student who engages in inappropriate online behavior as defined in this
section toward a public school employee or other person as defined in this
section shall be reported to the school district board of trustees or the
public charter school governing board for investigation and, if applicable,
for imposition of disciplinary measures.
(2) For purposes of this section:
(a) "Inappropriate online behavior" means any communication through
the internet, a mobile electronic device as defined in section
49-1401A, Idaho Code, or any other online means, including social me-
dia platforms, that harasses, threatens, or bullies any public school
employee or other person, whether it occurs during or outside of school
hours or on or off school property. The term includes but is not limited
to any online communication that:
(i) Contains obscene or discriminatory content directed at pub-
lic school employees or other persons; or
(ii) Harms the reputation, dignity, or safety of public school em-
ployees or other persons.
(b) "Person" means any student enrolled in any school district or pub-
lic charter school, any parent or legal guardian of a student enrolled
in any school district or public charter school, or any volunteer at any
school district or public charter school.
(c) "Public school employee" means a person directly employed by a
school district or public charter school, including administrators,
instructional staff, and pupil service staff.
(3) Upon receipt of a report regarding inappropriate online behavior
toward a public school employee or other person, the school district board
of trustees or the board's designee or the public charter school governing
board or the board's designee shall investigate the matter to determine the
veracity of the claims contained in the report. The investigation may in-
clude conducting interviews and gathering any relevant evidence. The school
district board of trustees or the public charter school governing board


shall notify the parents or legal guardians of the student about such report
and, if appropriate, notify law enforcement.
(4) If the school district board of trustees or the public charter
school governing board determines that the student engaged in inappropriate
online behavior as described in this section, the student and the parents or
legal guardians of such student shall meet with the school district board
of trustees or the public charter school governing board regarding dis-
ciplinary measures. The school district board of trustees or the public
charter school governing board shall impose appropriate and proportional
disciplinary measures, including but not limited to warning or reprimand,
required participation in an online behavior awareness program, temporary
suspension, or expulsion.
(5) Nothing in this section prohibits or prevents an adversely affected
public school employee or other person from pursuing any other available le-
gal remedies.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.